Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-220
Ecosystem, defined.

Ecosystem means a system of living organisms and their environment, each influencing the existence of the other and both necessary for the maintenance of life.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 30.